Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.075

Inclusion of number of child abuse reports and cases in prosecuting attorney's annual report.

Commencing in 1986, the prosecuting attorney shall include in the annual report a section stating the number of child abuse reports received by the office under this chapter and the number of cases where charges were filed.

[ 1985 c 259 s 4.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—1985 c 259: See note following RCW 26.44.030.